Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
367

STATUS OF
WOMEN

Section

367-1 Findings and purpose

367-2 State commission on status of women:
membership

367-2.3 Compensation

367-2.5 Executive director

367-3 Powers and duties of commission

367-4 County committees on status of women,
membership,

organization, etc.

367-5 Commission on the status of women trust
fund

Note

Affirmative consent task force to review University of
Hawaii's executive policy on sexual harassment, sexual assault, etc.; report to
2016-2017 legislature (ceases to exist on June 30, 2017). L 2015, c 222.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next